Nebraska, session 109, LB990.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB990 LB990
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-4602, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-4602 (1) Within fifteen days after the end of each month, the Tax
Commissioner shall provide a public statement of actual General Fund net
receipts, a comparison of such actual net receipts to the monthly
estimated net receipts from the most recent forecast provided by the
Nebraska Economic Forecasting Advisory Board pursuant to section
77-27,158, and a comparison of such actual net receipts to the monthly
actual net receipts for the same month of the previous fiscal year.
(2) Within fifteen days after the end of each fiscal year, the
public statement shall also include (a) a summary of actual General Fund
net receipts and estimated General Fund net receipts for the fiscal year
as certified pursuant to sections 77-4601 and 77-4603 and (b) a
comparison of the actual General Fund net receipts for the fiscal year to
the actual General Fund net receipts for the previous fiscal year.
(3)(a) Within fifteen days after the end of each fiscal year, the
Tax Commissioner shall determine:
(i) Actual General Fund net receipts for the most recently completed
fiscal year minus estimated General Fund net receipts for such fiscal
year as certified pursuant to sections 77-4601 and 77-4603; and
(ii) Actual General Fund net receipts for the most recently
completed fiscal year minus one hundred three percent of actual General
Fund net receipts for the prior fiscal year.
(b) If the amount calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this
section is a positive number and the amount calculated in subdivision (3)
(a)(ii) of this section is a negative number, the Tax Commissioner shall
certify the amount calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section to
the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall transfer such certified
amount to the Cash Reserve Fund.
(c) If the amounts calculated in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)
(ii) of this section are both positive numbers and the amount calculated
-2-

LB990 LB990
2026 2026
in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section exceeds the amount calculated in
subdivision (3)(a)(ii) of this section, the Tax Commissioner shall
certify the amounts calculated in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)(ii)
of this section to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall
transfer the difference between the two certified numbers to the Cash
Reserve Fund. The State Treasurer shall transfer the amount certified for
subdivision (3)(a)(ii) of this section to the Live Here Thrive Here
School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund.
(d) If the amounts calculated in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)
(ii) of this section are both positive numbers and the amount calculated
in subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section is less than the amount
calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(ii) of this section, the Tax
Commissioner shall certify the amount calculated in subdivision (3)(a)(i)
of this section to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall
transfer such certified amount to the Live Here Thrive Here School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund.
Sec. 2. Section 77-7301, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-7301 Sections 77-7301 to 77-7305 shall be known and may be cited
as the Live Here Thrive Here School District Property Tax Relief Act.
Sec. 3. Section 77-7302, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-7302 The purpose of the Live Here Thrive Here School District
Property Tax Relief Act is to provide property tax relief for property
taxes levied against real property by school districts. The property tax
relief will be made to owners of real property in the form of a property
tax credit.
Sec. 4. Section 77-7303, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-7303 For purposes of the Live Here Thrive Here School District
Property Tax Relief Act:
-3-

LB990 LB990
2026 2026
(1) Resident individual has the same meaning as in section
77-2714.01;
(2) (1) School district has the same meaning as in section 79-101;
and
(3) (2) School district taxes means property taxes levied on real
property in this state by a school district or multiple-district school
system, excluding any property taxes levied for bonded indebtedness and
any property taxes levied as a result of an override of limits on
property tax levies approved by voters pursuant to section 77-3444.
Sec. 5. Section 77-7304, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-7304 (1) The Live Here Thrive Here School District Property Tax
Relief Credit Fund is created. The fund shall only be used pursuant to
the Live Here Thrive Here School District Property Tax Relief Act. Any
money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2)(a) The State Treasurer shall transfer seven hundred fifty
million dollars from the General Fund to the Live Here Thrive Here School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund in fiscal year 2024-25, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(b) Beginning in fiscal year 2025-26, it is the intent of the
Legislature that an amount sufficient to provide the amount of property
tax relief required by subdivision (1)(a) of section 77-7305 for each tax
year be transferred from the General Fund to the Live Here Thrive Here
School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund.
Sec. 6. Section 77-7305, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-7305 (1) The Live Here Thrive Here School District Property Tax
Relief Act shall apply to tax year 2024 and each tax year thereafter. The
-4-

LB990 LB990
2026 2026
property tax relief shall be in the form of property tax credits which
appear on property tax statements. Property tax credits granted under the
act shall be credited against the amount of property taxes owed to school
districts. Beginning in tax year 2027 and for each tax year thereafter,
property tax credits granted under the act shall only be granted to real
property owners that are resident individuals. The total amount of
property tax relief granted under the act shall be determined as follows:
(a) For tax year 2024, the minimum amount of relief granted under
the act shall be seven hundred fifty million dollars. For tax year 2025,
the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be seven hundred
eighty million dollars. For tax year 2026, the minimum amount of relief
granted under the act shall be eight hundred eight million dollars. For
tax year 2027, the minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall
be eight hundred thirty-eight million dollars. For tax year 2028, the
minimum amount of relief granted under the act shall be eight hundred
seventy million dollars. For tax year 2029, the minimum amount of relief
granted under the act shall be nine hundred two million dollars. For tax
year 2030 and each tax year thereafter, the minimum amount of relief
granted under the act shall be the minimum amount of relief from the
prior year, excluding any additional relief provided pursuant to
subdivision (1)(b) of this section, with such amount then increased by
three percent; and
(b) If money is transferred to the Live Here Thrive Here School
District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund pursuant to section 77-4602,
such amount shall be added to the minimum amount required under
subdivision (1)(a) of this section when determining the total amount of
relief granted under the act for the tax year in which the transfer
occurs. If no such transfer occurs in a given tax year, the minimum
amount required under subdivision (1)(a) of this section shall be the
total amount of relief granted under the act for such tax year.
(2) To determine the amount of the property tax credit for each
-5-

LB990 LB990
2026 2026
parcel, the county treasurer shall multiply the amount disbursed to the
county under subsection (4) of this section by the ratio of the school
district taxes levied in the current year on the parcel to the school
district taxes levied in the current year on all real property in the
county. The amount so determined shall be the property tax credit for
that parcel.
(3) If the real property owner qualifies for a homestead exemption
under sections 77-3501 to 77-3529, the owner shall also be qualified for
the property tax credit provided in this section to the extent of any
remaining liability after calculation of the homestead exemption. If the
property tax credit provided in this section results in a property tax
liability on the homestead that is less than zero, the amount of the
credit which cannot be used by the taxpayer shall be returned to the
Property Tax Administrator by July 1 of the year the amount disbursed to
the county was disbursed. The Property Tax Administrator shall
immediately credit any funds returned under this subsection to the Live
Here Thrive Here School District Property Tax Relief Credit Fund. Upon
the return of any funds under this subsection, the county treasurer shall
electronically file a report with the Property Tax Administrator, on a
form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, indicating the amount of funds
distributed to each school district in the county in the year the funds
were returned and the amount of unused credits returned.
(4) The amount disbursed to each county under this section shall be
equal to the amount available for disbursement under subsection (1) of
this section multiplied by the ratio of the school district taxes levied
in the prior year on all real property in the county to the school
district taxes levied in the prior year on all real property in the
state. By September 15, 2024, and by September 15 of each year
thereafter, the Property Tax Administrator shall determine the amount to
be disbursed under this subsection to each county and shall certify such
amounts to the State Treasurer and to each county. The disbursements to
-6-

LB990 LB990
2026 2026
the counties shall occur in two equal payments, the first on or before
January 31 and the second on or before April 1.
(5) After retaining one percent of the amount received under
subsection (4) of this section for costs, the county treasurer shall
disburse the remaining funds, which are credited against the amount of
property taxes owed to school districts, in the same manner as if such
funds had been received in the form of property tax payments for property
taxes owed to school districts, meaning any amounts attributable to
divided taxes pursuant to section 18-2147 of the Community Development
Law shall be remitted to the applicable authority for which such taxes
were divided.
(6) The Live Here Thrive Here School District Property Tax Relief
Credit Fund shall be used for purposes of making the disbursements to
counties required under subsection (4) of this section.
Sec. 7. Original sections 77-7301, 77-7302, and 77-7303, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections 77-4602, 77-7304, and
77-7305, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-7-